New York, session 2025-2026, S4362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 7 of section 23 of the executive 2 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 3-a to read as follows: 3 (3-a) a public education component that shall be widely disseminated, 4 as approved by the division of homeland security and emergency services 5 pursuant to regulations promulgated by such division, and shall take 6 into consideration the linguistic and cultural characteristics of the 7 inhabitants; 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 9 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05640-01-5